North Carolina statutes. Chapter 29. Intestate Succession.
Article 4. Adopted Children.

§ 29-17.
Succession by, through and from adopted children.

A child, adopted in accordance with Chapter 48 of the General Statutes or in accordance with the applicable law of any other jurisdiction, and the heirs of such child, are entitled by succession to any property by, through and from the child’s adoptive parents and their heirs the same as if the child were the natural legitimate child of the adoptive parents.

An adopted child is not entitled by succession to any property, by, through, or from the child’s natural parents or their heirs, except as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

The adoptive parents and the heirs of the adoptive parents are entitled by succession to any property, by, through and from an adopted child the same as if the adopted child were the natural legitimate child of the adoptive parents.

The natural parents and the heirs of the natural parents are not entitled by succession to any property, by, through or from an adopted child, except as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

If a natural parent has previously married, is married to, or shall marry an adoptive parent, the adopted child is considered the child of such natural parent for all purposes of intestate succession.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 2011-344, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 5, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, in subsections (a) and (b), substituted “the child’s” for “his”; and in subsection (a), substituted “the child” for “he.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article on interstate and foreign adoptions in North Carolina, see 40 N.C.L. Rev. 691 (1962).

For article, “Recognition of Foreign Judgments,” see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 21 (1971).

For comment, “The Adoptee’s Right of Access to Sealed Adoption Records in North Carolina,” see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 563 (1980).